Illinois, session 104th, HB2806.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The STEM Opportunity Scholarship Program 8Fund. 9    Section 10. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 10amended by adding Section 65.122 as follows: 11    (110 ILCS 947/65.122 new)12    Sec. 65.122. STEM Opportunity Scholarship Program.13    (a) The Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall 14establish, implement, and administer a STEM Opportunity 15Scholarship Program, using funds appropriated from the STEM 16Opportunity Scholarship Program Fund, for the purpose of 17offering scholarships to young women pursuing degrees in the 18fields of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics at 19public universities in this State.20    (b) The Commission shall, on an annual basis, receive and 21consider applications for scholarship assistance under the   HB2806- 2 -LRB104 08165 LNS 18213 b1Program. An applicant is eligible for a scholarship under the 2Program if the Commission finds that the applicant meets all 3of the following criteria:4        (1) The applicant is a woman and a resident of this 5    State.6        (2) The applicant is enrolled in a public university 7    in this State on at least a part-time basis.8    (c) When selecting scholarship recipients from amounts 9available for eligible applicants, the Commission shall give 10first preference to previous recipients of a scholarship under 11the Program, as long as the recipient continues to meet the 12eligibility requirements set forth in subsection (b) and 13maintains satisfactory academic progress, as determined by the 14public university at which the recipient is enrolled. In 15considering new recipients, the Commission shall prioritize 16funding for students with financial need, as determined by the 17Commission.18    (d) The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by 19the Commission under this Section to an eligible applicant in 20any given fiscal year, when added to other financial 21assistance awarded to that individual for that year, may not 22exceed the cost of attendance at the public university at 23which the individual is enrolled. If the amount of financial 24assistance to be awarded to a qualified student exceeds the 25cost of attendance at the public university at which the 26student is enrolled, the scholarship awarded under this   HB2806- 3 -LRB104 08165 LNS 18213 b1Section shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount by 2which the combined financial assistance available to the 3student exceeds the cost of attendance.4    (e) The STEM Opportunity Scholarship Program Fund is 5created as a special fund in the State treasury. All money in 6the Fund shall be used, subject to appropriation, by the 7Commission for the purposes of this Section.8    (f) Funding for the Program is subject to appropriation. 9Additional contributions from private entities, philanthropic 10organizations, or federal grants may supplement the Program.11    (g) The Commission shall make all necessary and proper 12rules not inconsistent with this Section for its effective 13implementation, with the guidance and assistance of public 14universities in this State.